Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Human Services
from the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62

of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of One Hundred Ninety-five
Thousand Dollars ($195,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary due to increased costs of the project funded in Section 4
of Enrolled House Bill No. 2884 of the 1st Regular Session of the
59th Oklahoma Legislature. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner
consistent with recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on
Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Human Services
from the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Three Hundred Twenty-eight
Thousand Dollars ($328,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary due to increased costs of the project funded in Section 7
of Enrolled House Bill No. 2884 of the 1st Regular Session of the
59th Oklahoma Legislature. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner
consistent with recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on
Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Human Services
from the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary due to
increased costs of the project funded in Section 1 of Enrolled House
Bill No. 2884 of the 1st Regular Session of the 59th Oklahoma
Legislature. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner consistent
with recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a Statewide
Recovery Special Account for the Department of Human Services for
each appropriation section of this act. The duration of such
accounts shall continue for the period of time that monies related
to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are being budgeted,
expended, or managed in the state. The ending of such period shall
be determined by the State Treasurer, and shall result in the
closing of such accounts as a matter of law. Such accounts shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 2791 Page 2

continuing accounts as otherwise provided in this section, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall exclusively consist of
monies related to the relevant appropriations made in this act and
as otherwise directed by law. All monies deposited to the credit of
such accounts are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department of Human Services in accordance with the
provisions of this act. Expenditures from such accounts shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The Department of Human Services is authorized to request in
writing that the monies appropriated by the provisions of this act
be deposited or transferred to the accounts created pursuant to
subsection A of this section. No later than seven (7) calendar days
from the date of such request, the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall comply with such request
and verify to the requesting agency that such deposit or transfer
has been completed.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services may enter into memorandums of
understanding with other agencies of the State of Oklahoma for the
auditing, documentation, evaluation, implementation, oversight,
reporting, and management of funds and associated efforts related to
the appropriations made in this act; provided, no such memorandum of
understanding shall require or include, as an option or condition,
the direct or practical transfer or relinquishment of control by the
agency appropriated such funds to budget, expend, allocate, and
request the distribution of the funds appropriated by this act.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules, utilize
existing rules, establish procedures, and utilize existing
procedures to implement the provisions of this act, provided such
rules and procedures do not conflict with or impede the provisions
of this act.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 2791 Page 3

The Department of Human Services shall retain no more than two
percent (2%) of the funds appropriated by this act to reimburse:
1. Costs incurred by the Department of Human Services; or
2. Costs incurred on the agency's behalf,
associated with the administration of the appropriated funds and
programming required by the Department of Human Services under the
provisions of this act; provided, no funds shall be retained that
would be disallowable under the provisions of the American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall:
1. Submit to the chairs of the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding, or any successor Oklahoma House of Representatives
or Oklahoma State Senate legislative committee or joint committee,
as designated by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate:
a. a written or electronic quarterly report detailing the
budgeting, expenditure, and management of all monies
appropriated in this act, and
b. a copy of all memorandums of understanding and
contracts with third parties entered into by the
Department of Human Services to facilitate, assist, or
administer powers and duties provided to the
Department under the provisions of this act; and
2. At the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding's request,
appear before the Joint Committee no later than six (6) months after
the effective date of this act, and as otherwise requested by the
Joint Committee, to provide a status update regarding the
implementation of the provisions of this act.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall remain
applicable for the period of time that monies appropriated under
this act are being budgeted, expended, or managed in the state. The
ending of such period shall be determined by the State Treasurer,
ENR. H. B. NO. 2791 Page 4

and shall be reported to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2791 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2791 Page 6